Alabama, session 2026rs, HB506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-51-84, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§45-51-84
(a) The per annum compensation shall be eighty-eight
thousand dollars ($88,000) for the judge of probate effective
October 1, 1996.
(b) The compensation amount in subsection (a) shall be
paid out of the general fund of the Montgomery County
Commission in the same manner as other county employees are
paid.
(c) Subsequent to October 1, 1996, the compensation
amount in subsection (a) shall be increased by the same
percentage as the across-the-board percentage increase
received by full-time county employees at the same time as the
increase is received by the county employees, except that the
amount shall not be increased by more than three thousand
Page 1

amount shall not be increased by more than three thousand
HB506 INTRODUCED
dollars ($3,000) in any fiscal year.
(d) In lieu of the compensation provided in subsection
(a), any individual who has served at least six full years as
the Montgomery County Judge of Probate shall receive an annual
salary equal to the salary of a circuit judge with the same
years of service as the judge of probate."
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2